North Carolina, session 2025, SB147.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-270.25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-270.25. Out-of-state license applicants.
(a) The State Board of Education shall grant a CPL to an applicant who is a teacher
licensed in another state with substantially similar licensure requirements who and has at least
three years of teaching experience and is in good standing with the other state.
(b) The State Board of Education shall not require an out-of-state license applicant to
complete or have completed any type of standardized examination as a condition of receiving a
CPL pursuant to subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to out-of-state
license applications submitted on or after that date.
*S147-v-1*